Hawaii statutes.
[§383-30.5] Good cause for
separation from part-time employment. (a) In applying the provisions of
section 383-30(1), an individual who has established eligibility based on full-time
employment may be found to have good cause for voluntarily separating from
subsequent part-time employment based on any of the following conditions:

(1) Loss of full-time work with a regular employer
made it economically unfeasible to continue part-time employment;

(2) The part-time employment was outside the
individual's customary occupation and would not have been considered suitable
work at the time the individual accepted part-time employment. In determining
whether an individual is reasonably fitted for a particular job, the department
shall consider:

(A) The degree of risk involved to the
individual's health, safety, and morals;

(B) The individual's physical fitness;

(C) The individual's prior training;

(D) The individual's experience;

(E) The individual's prior earnings;

(F) The length of the individual's
unemployment;

(G) The individual's prospects for obtaining
work in the individual's customary occupation;

(H) The distance of available work from the
individual's residence; and

(I) The individual's prospects for obtaining
local work.

As used in this
paragraph, "suitable work" means work in the individual's usual
occupation or work for which the individual is reasonably fitted;

(3) The employer failed to provide sufficient advance
notice of a work schedule change;

(4) There was a work schedule conflict with other
concurrent part-time or full-time employment;

(5) A real, substantial, or compelling reason, or a
reason that would cause a reasonable and prudent employee, genuinely and
sincerely desirous of maintaining employment, to take similar action and to try
reasonable alternatives before terminating the employment relationship;

(6) Change in working conditions and the change is
prejudicial or detrimental to the health, safety, or morals of the employee;

(7) Change in terms and conditions of employment,
including change in rate of pay, position or grade, duties, days of work, or
hours of work;

(8) Discrimination that violates federal or state
laws regarding equal employment opportunity practices;

(9) Change in the employee's marital or domestic
status;

(10) Acceptance of a definite, firm offer made of
other employment where the offer is subsequently withdrawn and the former
employer refuses to rehire the employee;

(11) Retirement under a mandatory requirement imposed
by a collective bargaining agreement;

(12) Evidence that the employee was a victim of
domestic or sexual violence, including any circumstance that causes a
reasonable employee to believe that other available alternatives, such as a
leave of absence, a transfer of jobs, or an alternate work schedule, would not
be sufficient to guarantee the safety of the employee and that separation from
employment was necessary to address the resulting physical and psychological
effects, to seek or reside in an emergency shelter, or to avoid future domestic
or sexual violence. Evidence includes police records, court records,
statements from the individual, a volunteer of a victim services organization,
the employee’s attorney or advocate, a member of the clergy, medical, or other
professional from whom the employee has sought assistance related to the
domestic or sexual violence, or other corroborating evidence. As used in this
paragraph, "domestic or sexual violence" includes domestic abuse,
sexual assault, or stalking; or

(13) Any other factor relevant to a determination of
good cause.

(b)
For purposes of this section:

"Part-time" means less than twenty
hours per week or on-call or casual or intermittent. [L 2011, c 165, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next